src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E, f (->) F, g (->) G,
h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L, m (->) M, n (->) N,
o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S, t (->) T, u (->) U,
ä (->) Ä, ü (->) Ü, ś (->) Ś, š (->) Š, ž (->) Ž, ö (->) Ö, č (->) Č,
ń (->) Ń, ḿ (->) Ḿ, ŕ (->) Ŕ, ĺ (->) Ĺ,
u̬ (->) U̬, ü̬ (->) Ü̬, i̬ (->) I̬, õ̭ (->) Õ̭,
v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z, õ (->) Õ, å (->) Å || .#. _ ;
